src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE:%>'áng'waaäseehl # ;

LEXICON CLASS-UUHL-STEM-2 !!= @CODE@
+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>ga # ;
+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>gáng # ;
+V+DIRECT+PAST:%>gán # ;
+V+NON_FACTIVE:%>%.áng # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng # ;
+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gánggang # ;
+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>gangáng # ;
+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>gíinii # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>gáangaa # ;
+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>gáangaan # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:%>áng% %^WSk̲asa'áa # ;
+V+NEAR+FUTURE:%>áng% %^WSk̲asa'áang # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>áng% %^WSk̲asaasdláa # ;
+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>áng% %^WSk̲asaasdláang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng'waa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng'waang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>gáng'waa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng'anggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>gáng'angang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:%>áng% %^WSk̲asaa'áng # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:%>áng% %^WSk̲asaa'ánggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>áng% %^WSk̲asaasdlä'áng # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>áng% %^WSk̲asaasdlä'ánggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng'ang'waa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng'ang'waang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>gáng'ang'waa%.ang # ;

LEXICON CLASS-UUHL-STEM-3 !!= @CODE@
+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>áa # ;
+V+INDIRECT+PAST:%>áan # ;
+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL:%>áas # ;
+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE:%>áa%.ang # ;
+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT:%>'ahlánggang # ;
+V+CERTAIN+PAST:%>'ahlánggan # ;
+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'ahlánggíinii # ;
+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE:%>'ahláns # ;
+V+INTENSIVE+PAST:%>áa'ahlang # ;
+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE:%>áa'ahlanggaa # ;
+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT:%>áa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+REFLEXIVE:%>'ahl # ;

!LEXICON CLASS-UUHL-STEM-2
!+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>ga # ;
!+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>gáng # ;
!+V+DIRECT+PAST:%>gán # ;
!+V+NON_FACTIVE:%>%.áng # ;
!+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng # ;
!+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gánggang # ;
!+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>gangáng # ;
!+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>gíinii # ;
!+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>gáangaa # ;
!+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:%>gáangaan # ;
!+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:%>áng% %^WS�asa'�a # ;
!+V+NEAR+FUTURE:%>áng% %^WS�asa'�ang # ;
!+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>áng% %^WS�asaasdl�a # ;
!+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>áng% %^WS�asaasdl�ang # ;
!+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng'waa # ;
!+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng'waang # ;
!+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>gáng'waa%.ang # ;
!+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng'anggang # ;
!+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>gáng'angang # ;
!+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:%>áng% %^WS�asaa'�ng # ;
!+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:%>áng% %^WS�asaa'�nggang # ;
!+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>áng% %^WS�asaasdl�'�ng # ;
!+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>áng% %^WS�asaasdl�'�nggang # ;
!+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng'ang'waa # ;
!+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL:%>gáng'ang'waang # ;
!+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE:%>gáng'ang'waa%.ang # ;
