src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs !!= @CODE@
gúuhl:gúl CLASS-UUHL-STEM-2 "for S to be in love with X, infatuated with X" ;
gúuhl:gwáal CLASS-UUHL-STEM-3 "for S to be in love with X, infatuated with X" ;
INS% sk'úuhl:INS% sk'úl CLASS-UUHL-STEM-2 "for S to make C watertight, waterproof, plug the holes in C" ;
INS% sk'úuhl:INS% sk'wáal CLASS-UUHL-STEM-3 "for S to make C watertight, waterproof, plug the holes in C" ;
jáagä% gúuhl:jáagä% gúl CLASS-UUHL-STEM-2 "for S to be in love" ;
jáagä% gúuhl:jáagä% gwáal CLASS-UUHL-STEM-3 "for S to be in love" ;
sk'úuhl:sk'úl CLASS-UUHL-STEM-2 "for S to be watertight, waterproof" ;
sk'úuhl:sk'wáal CLASS-UUHL-STEM-3 "for S to be watertight, waterproof" ;
t'ahlgúuhl:t'ahlgúl CLASS-UUHL-STEM-2 "for S to put or wrap O around their shoulders" ;
t'ahlgúuhl:t'ahlgwáal CLASS-UUHL-STEM-3 "for S to put or wrap O around their shoulders" ;
ts'áng% sk'úuhl:ts'áng% sk'úl CLASS-UUHL-STEM-2 "for S to be tightly woven" ;
ts'áng% sk'úuhl:ts'áng% sk'wáal CLASS-UUHL-STEM-3 "for S to be tightly woven" ;
